Utah statutes.
17B-1-1101.   Provisions applicable to a local district's issuance of bonds.

Subject to the provisions of this part:

(1)  each local district that issues bonds shall:

(a)  issue them as provided in, as applicable:

(i)  Title 11, Chapter 14, Local Government Bonding Act; or

(ii)  Title 11, Chapter 42, Assessment Area Act; and

(b)  receive the benefits of Title 11, Chapter 30, Utah Bond Validation Act; and

(2)  each local district that issues refunding bonds shall issue them as provided in Title 11, Chapter 27, Utah Refunding Bond Act.

